California, session 20252026, SB10.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 71152 of the Public Resources Code is amended to read:71152. (a) It is the intent of the Legislature to prioritize the most vulnerable communities, ecosystems, and economic sectors in the state’s climate adaptation and resilience strategy set forth in the Safeguarding California Plan by ensuring that all state departments and agencies accurately identify, collaboratively prepare for, and are sufficiently resourced to adequately respond to the impacts of climate change, such as extreme weather events, the urban heat island effect, habitat loss, wildfire, sea level rise, and drought.(b) It also is the intent of the Legislature that the agency consider developing policies to address the impacts of climate change and climate adaptation with a focus on equity and that actions taken to address climate adaptation should be consistent with the plan. In developing these policies and taking these actions, all of the following shall occur:(1) The creation of planning processes that are transparent, fair, and inclusive in the development phases.(2) The prioritization of resources and investments for vulnerable communities and populations.(3) The adoption of strategies that seek to address and, at a minimum, avoid worsening social and racial social, racial, and gender inequities.SEC. 2. Section 71341 of the Public Resources Code is amended to read:71341. The California Climate Change Assessment shall provide an integrated suite of products that report the impacts and risks of climate change, based on the best available science, and identify potential solutions to inform legislative policy. These products shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:(a) Downscaled climate projections that assess climate change impacts throughout the state, including at regional and local levels, for near-term, medium-term, and long-term timescales, and under varied emissions scenarios, as appropriate and supported by the availability of the data, as determined by the Office of Planning and Research.(b) A set of research reports that examine, but need not be limited to, all of the following:(1) How climate change will affect built systems, natural systems, and social systems, including the welfare of vulnerable communities, and the potential fiscal and economic impacts of these effects in California.(2) Identification of potential climate adaptation and mitigation responses, including their costs and benefits.(c) Regionally specific reports that can inform regional and local vulnerability assessments, adaptation planning, and community resilience efforts.(d) Reports on issues of statewide significance, including, but not limited to, environmental justice considerations, gender impact considerations, impacts on the systems identified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b), and the unique risks posed to, and research and monitoring approaches used by, tribal communities.(e) Decision-support tools for planners, decisionmakers, and others, including organizations that serve vulnerable communities, that allow for actionable application of assessment research findings. To the extent data is available, this shall include guidance regarding assessment of the financial and economic costs and benefits of adaptation decisions.(f) Examples of best practices for planning for future climate conditions and approaches to building adaptation and resilience, while also meeting established greenhouse gas emission reduction goals.SEC. 3. Section 71361 of the Public Resources Code is amended to read:71361. (a) On or before July 1, 2026, and every three years thereafter, the office and the Natural Resources Agency, in consultation with relevant state agencies and to be integrated into the climate adaptation strategy developed pursuant to Section 71153, shall update the Extreme Heat Action Plan to promote comprehensive, coordinated, and effective state and local government action on extreme heat. Updates to the Extreme Heat Action Plan shall include all of the following:(1) Review of relevant actions and grants that state agencies have undertaken to mitigate extreme heat and implement the Extreme Heat Action Plan, including, but not limited to, an in-depth review of select programs and actions, including, but not limited to, the ICARP Extreme Heat and Community Resilience Grant Program, as described in Item 0650-101-0001 of the Budget Act of 2022, projects that use cool and reflective surfaces, and efforts to address extreme heat on California’s school campuses.(2) A description of the resources, budget allocations, expenditures, and staff dedicated to addressing extreme heat.(3) A review of state programs that address extreme heat to identify potential gaps or unmet needs in the state’s approach and that includes recommendations on ways to improve policies, programs, and interagency coordination.(4) Recommendations on additional measures to protect vulnerable populations, such as pupils and students, from the impacts of extreme heat, including, but not limited to, community cooling strategies.(b) (1) On or before July 1, 2028, the office and the Natural Resources Agency shall conduct an assessment of the disparate and differentiated gendered impacts and risks of extreme heat for purposes of integration into updates to the Extreme Heat Action Plan developed pursuant to subdivision (a). The assessment shall be known as the “gender assessment.” In conducting the gender assessment, intersectional and systemic inequities shall be considered. The gender assessment shall include all of the following:(A) An analysis of the disparate and differentiated gendered impacts and risks of extreme heat to identify gaps or unmet needs in the state’s approach to addressing extreme heat.(B) An analysis of sex- or gender-disaggregated data, where available, on workers in relevant sectors, including, but not limited to, health care and care workers, outdoor workers, and others, to identify those substantially responsible for protecting community health and supporting community resilience in response to extreme heat, as well as those substantially in danger of negative impacts at work from extreme heat.(C) Recommendations on additional measures or priority actions to address the disparate and differentiated gendered impacts of extreme heat to improve policies, programs, and interagency coordination. State agencies may consider these recommendations in developing their policies and programs.(2) The gender assessment shall be posted on the office’s and the Natural Resources Agency’s internet websites and shall be provided to the relevant policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature, consistent with the requirements of Section 9795 of the Government Code.(b)(c) The Extreme Heat Action Plan and subsequent updates shall be posted on the office’s and the Natural Resources Agency’s internet websites and, notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, shall be provided to the relevant policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature.(c)(d) For purposes of this section, “Extreme Heat Action Plan” means the April 2022 plan entitled “Protecting Californians From Extreme Heat: A State Action Plan to Build Community Resilience.”SECTION 1.The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(a)The Tijuana River Valley has been a longstanding site of significant environmental degradation due to cross-border pollution, including untreated sewage, industrial waste, and other contaminants that flow from Tijuana, Mexico, into the United States of America.(b)According to the Department of Parks and Recreation, the Tijuana River National Estuarine Research Reserve is the largest coastal wetland and one of the few remaining salt marshes in southern California.(c)This pollution severely impacts communities in California, particularly the City of Imperial Beach, and other nearby neighborhoods in the County of San Diego. These areas are experiencing elevated rates of respiratory illnesses, gastrointestinal diseases, and skin conditions linked to exposure to contaminated water and air.(d)The rapid economic expansion in the border region, driven in part by trade agreements such as the United States-Mexico-Canada Agreement (USMCA), has resulted in increased industrial production, cross-border transportation, and waste generation, exacerbating pollution in the Tijuana River Valley.(e)The life cycle of many products manufactured in the region, including electronics, textiles, and consumer goods, contributes to environmental degradation at every stage, from raw material extraction to production, transport, use, and disposal. Many of these products are produced in factories that discharge untreated waste into the Tijuana River or adjacent lands.(f)The health and safety of residents and visitors to the Tijuana River Valley and surrounding communities are of paramount importance. The Legislature acknowledges the severe public health risks posed by ongoing pollution in the region and recognizes the need for a permanent funding source to provide resources to mitigate the crisis.(g)Pursuant to the Utilization of Waters of the Colorado and Tijuana Rivers and of the Rio Grande Treaty of 1944 between the United States of America and Mexico, the International Boundary and Water Commission (IBWC) gained status as an international body to resolve water quality issues related to transboundary pollution from border rivers and streams.(h)In 1996, the United States Section of the IBWC (USIBWC) used funding from the United States Environmental Protection Agency to build the South Bay International Wastewater Treatment Plant (SBIWTP). The plant is permitted to treat up to 25,000,000 gallons per day of raw sewage and other waste water.(i)Due to unchecked expansion leading to unexpectedly high flows, the SBIWTP has become overwhelmed and left only partially operational in need of critical repairs. According to the IBWC, 100 billion gallons of untreated sewage and other pollutants have been dumped into the Tijuana River in the past five years.(j)The USIBWC and the Mexico Section of the IBWC (La Comisión Internacional de Límites y Aguas or “CILA”) entered into an agreement called the “Comprehensive Infrastructure Solution,” which identified targeted infrastructure projects on both sides of the border. The latest cost estimate from the IBWC for implementation of this agreement is now $900,000,000, which would repair and expand the capacity of the facility but does not include maintenance.(k)In July 2020, Congress appropriated $300,000,000 through the USMCA to mitigate the transboundary flows through expansion of the existing SBIWTP.(l)In 2024, Congress appropriated $156,000,000 as a part of the 2024 appropriations bill. However, there has been no ongoing funding source appropriated to maintain operations of the SBIWTP.(m)The appropriation of an ongoing and reliable funding source is critical to the health and safety of the residents of the southern portion of the County of San Diego.(n)Funds from the toll collected at the proposed East Otay Mesa may be used to address water and air pollution and used to offset the financial obligations to the IBWC from the federal government.SEC. 2.Section 31475 of the Streets and Highways Code is amended to read:31475.(a)Toll revenues under this chapter may be used to reimburse or finance the costs incurred in connection with the implementation, construction, maintenance, or operation of a project, including reimbursement of federal funds specifically allocated to SANDAG for a project or projects by the federal government or other funds from funding sources that are not otherwise available to state agencies for transportation-related projects. SANDAG shall be reimbursed for administrative costs in an amount that shall not exceed 3 percent of toll revenues under this chapter.(b)Toll revenues shall be used to pay for costs in the following categories:(1)Payments pursuant to bonds and resolutions, indentures, and other constituent instruments defining the rights of the holders of bonds and any repayment or reimbursement obligations of SANDAG to any providers of bond insurance or letters of credit or lines of credit related to bonds.(2)SANDAG costs for operations, toll collection, and administration of the projects.(3)Reimbursement or payment to federal, state, and local agencies for costs incurred by or payable to those agencies for services, equipment, goods, fixtures, operation, maintenance, personnel, or software provided to or in furtherance of a project that are reimbursable pursuant to a written agreement between SANDAG and the respective agency.(4)Costs for capital improvements to repair or rehabilitate a project, to expand project capacity, to improve project operations, or to increase public transit and nonmotorized options in the corridor.(5)Costs for projects that increase transportation options along the corridor or at the Otay Mesa East Port of Entry, including, but not limited to, public transit and nonmotorized transportation that would result in reduced vehicle miles traveled, pursuant to the plan approved by the board pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 31476 that specifies the expenditure of toll revenues.(6)Payments pursuant to an agreement under Section 31483.(c)Consistent with applicable federal and state laws, toll revenues may be used to assist in the maintenance of the South Bay International Boundary and Water Commission sewage treatment facility and the development of additional sanitation infrastructure projects related to the Tijuana River pursuant to an agreement with the federal government.(d)The repayment of bond obligations shall take priority over other allocations of toll revenues under this chapter.SEC. 3.The Legislature finds and declares that a special statute is necessary and that a general statute cannot be made applicable within the meaning of Section 16 of Article IV of the California Constitution because of the unique need to mitigate the sewage crisis in the County of San Diego by funding the maintenance of the South Bay International Boundary and Water Commission sewage treatment facility.